Florida, session 2026, HB863.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraph (ll) of subsection (6) of section
627.351, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
627.351 Insurance risk apportionment plans.—
(6) CITIZENS PROPERTY INSURANCE CORPORATION.—
(ll)1. In addition to any other method of alternative
dispute resolution authorized by state law, the corporation may
adopt policy forms that provide an option for the insured to
select, at the time of entering into the policy or upon renewal,
to have disputes regarding the corporation's claim
determinations for the resolution of disputes regarding its
claim determinations, including disputes regarding coverage for,
or the scope and value of, a claim, resolved through arbitration
in a proceeding before the Division of Administrative Hearings.
Each insured must be notified in writing, at the time of
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb863-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 863 2026
entering into a policy with the corporation and upon each
renewal, that the insured must decide whether to resolve
disputes through arbitration before the Division of
Administrative Hearings. Such notification must be in at least
12-point boldfaced type, immediately preceding the insured's
signature, in substantially the following form:

AN INSURED MUST CHOOSE AT THE TIME OF ENTERING INTO THIS POLICY
OR UPON RENEWAL WHETHER TO RESOLVE DISPUTES THROUGH ARBITRATION
BEFORE THE DIVISION OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS. THE INSURED MUST
INDICATE THIS SELECTION BY MARKING "ACCEPT" OR "DECLINE" BELOW.
THIS DECISION CANNOT BE CHANGED DURING THE TERM OF THE POLICY.

[ ] ACCEPT
[ ] DECLINE

2. Any such policies are not subject to s. 627.70154. All
arbitrations before proceedings in the Division of
Administrative Hearings pursuant to such policies are subject to
ss. 57.105 and 768.79 as if filed in the courts of this state
and are not considered chapter 120 administrative proceedings.
Rule 1.442, Florida Rules of Civil Procedure, applies to any
offer served pursuant to s. 768.79, except that, notwithstanding
any provision in Rule 1.442, Florida Rules of Civil Procedure,
to the contrary, an offer shall not be served earlier than 10
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb863-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 863 2026
days after filing the request for hearing with the Division of
Administrative Hearings and shall not be served later than 10
days before the date set for the final hearing. The
administrative law judge in such arbitrations proceedings shall
award attorney fees and other relief pursuant to ss. 57.105 and
768.79. The corporation may not seek, and the office may not
approve, a maximum hourly rate for attorney fees.
2. The corporation may contract with the division to
conduct proceedings to resolve disputes regarding its claim
determinations as may be provided for in the applicable policies
of insurance. This subparagraph expires July 1, 2026.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb863-00